Colorado, session 2026A, HB1176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.3-1303, amend
(3)(b)(II) as follows:
23-3.3-1303. Fourth-year innovation pilot program - creation -
eligibility - award of state funding - commission policies.
(3) (b) (II) (A) FOR AN ELIGIBLE GRADUATE WHO GRADUATES EARLY
DURING THE 2021-22, 2022-23, 2023-24, OR 2024-25 SCHOOL YEAR, the
general assembly shall also MAY appropriate to the department of education
in the budget year that commences in July following the student's early
graduation an amount sufficient for payment of NOT TO EXCEED twenty-five
percent of the average state share of the state average per-pupil revenues for
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

the 2021-22 budget year, as calculated during the 2021 regular legislative
session, for distribution to the local education provider from which the
eligible graduate graduated early prior to completion of the eligible
graduate's fourth year of high school. The local education provider is
encouraged to direct a portion of the money received pursuant to this
subsection (3)(b)(II) to high-quality career and postsecondary counseling
and supports to ensure that students who may be eligible for state funding
are aware of the pilot program and receive appropriate assistance in
determining how to allocate state funding received pursuant to the pilot
program to their intended postsecondary program.
(B) IN A STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR WHICH THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED
IS LESS THAN TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE AVERAGE STATE SHARE AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(A) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION SHALL PRORATE THE DISTRIBUTION TO EACH LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER FROM WHICH AN ELIGIBLE GRADUATE GRADUATED
FROM ANY MONEY APPROPRIATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(A)
OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.3-1305, repeal (4)
and (5) as follows:
23-3.3-1305. Reporting requirements.
(4) On or before November 1, 2026, the department, in collaboration
with the department of education, shall submit a final evaluation to the
governor's office of state planning and budgeting, the joint budget
committee, and the education committees of the house of representatives
and of the senate, or their successor committees, which must be posted to
the department's website and include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Analysis of all the data collected pursuant to the annual reporting
requirements of this section to assess the impacts and outcomes of the pilot
program on the student cohorts participating in the pilot program;
(b) Objective measures of changes in student behavior resulting
from implementation of the pilot program, including whether a student
enrolled in a participating school is:
(I) More likely to graduate early; and
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1176

(II) More likely to enroll in a postsecondary program, if the student
graduated early;
(c) Analysis of the cost-effectiveness of the pilot program, including
the impact on the state budget of the pilot program's incentives for school
districts and students when students graduate from high school a single
semester or a year early;
(d) Other information relevant to the costs, benefits, successes, and
challenges of the pilot program; and
(e) Recommendations concerning the feasibility and advisability of
continuing the pilot program beyond the pilot stage and changes, if any, that
are needed to continue the program beyond the pilot stage.
(5) (a) The department, in collaboration with the department of
education, may request, and participating local education providers shall
provide, data necessary to complete the final evaluation required in
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Student data collected pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
and this subsection (5) must be disaggregated by gender, grade level, local
education provider type, ethnicity, disability, English language learner
status, free and reduced-price lunch status, and housing status to the
maximum extent possible in compliance with the "Colorado Privacy Act",
established pursuant to part 13 of article 1 of title 6; the federal "Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Rights Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g;
and the "Student Data Transparency and Security Act" created pursuant to
article 16 of title 22. The department and the department of education shall
maintain strict standards for student data privacy; comply with standards for
reporting data for a student with an accommodation pursuant to section 504
of the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973", 29 U.S.C. sec. 701 et seq., as
amended, and its implementing regulations, or a student with an
individualized education plan; and shall not publicly report individual
student data for any purpose.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.3-1304, amend
(1) and (2)(a) as follows:
23-3.3-1304. Receipt and use of state funding.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1176

(1) To receive state funding pursuant to the pilot program, an
eligible graduate must graduate early from a high school participating in the
pilot program. The AN eligible graduate WHO GRADUATES EARLY DURING
THE 2021-22, 2022-23, 2023-24, OR 2024-25 SCHOOL YEAR must commence
a postsecondary program within eighteen months after graduating early, or
the eligible graduate forfeits the state funding. AN ELIGIBLE GRADUATE WHO
GRADUATES EARLY DURING THE 2025-26 SCHOOL YEAR MUST COMMENCE A
POSTSECONDARY PROGRAM NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, OR THE
ELIGIBLE GRADUATE FORFEITS THE STATE FUNDING.
(2) (a) The department shall disburse state funding on behalf of the
eligible graduate to the eligible graduate's postsecondary program within
thirty business days after a request is made in the manner determined
pursuant to commission policies and department guidelines. The eligible
graduate's postsecondary program shall remit to the eligible graduate that
portion of state funding remaining after payment of tuition, fees, and other
expenses related to the student's cost of attendance that are payable to the
postsecondary program. The eligible graduate shall use remaining state
funding for the purposes described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE ALL DISBURSEMENTS TO ELIGIBLE GRADUATES'
POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(a) NO LATER THAN THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1176

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 4. Appropriation to the department of higher education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter
476, (SB 25-206), amend Part VII (3)(C) and the affected totals as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VII
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(3) COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION FINANCIAL AID
(C) Special Purpose
Veterans'/Law Enforcement/
POW Tuition Assistance 1,643,700 1,643,700
Native American
Students/Fort Lewis College 21,307,918 21,307,918
Colorado Opportunity
Scholarship Initiative Fund 10,000,000 10,000,000
Tuition Assistance for Career
and Technical Education
Certificate Programs 450,000 450,000
Fourth-year Innovation Pilot
Program 555,573 555,573
524,615 524,615
(1.0 FTE)
(0.7 FTE)
State Aid for Foster Students
Program 2,962,463 2,962,463
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1176

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Postsecondary Assistance for
Students who were Homeless
in High School 1,655,041 1,655,041
(2.0 FTE)
38,574,695.0
38,543,737
TOTALS PART VII
(HIGHER EDUCATION) $6,492,016,560 $452,336,026 $1,232,865,809a $3,430,837,406b $1,349,232,021 $26,745,298c
$6,491,985,602 $452,305,068
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $329,555,015 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1176

SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1176